California, session 20252026, SB433.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 1569.147 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:1569.147. (a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, this chapter does not authorize the imposition of rent regulations or controls for licensed residential care facilities for the elderly.(b) Licensed residential care facilities for the elderly are not subject to controls on rent imposed by any state or local agency or other local government entity.(c)Subdivisions (a) and (b) may be waived by the State Department of Health Care Services and the State Department of Social Services when determined necessary and appropriate, as described in Section 14132.26 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.(d)(c) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b), a licensed residential care facility for the elderly contracted to receive Medi-Cal reimbursement for services provided to a resident enrolled in Medi-Cal shall not charge that resident a room and board rate exceeding the difference between the resident’s income and the personal and incidental needs allowance set for a recipient of SSI/SSP in nonmedical out-of-home care, as established by the department pursuant to Section 13921 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. For the purposes of this section, the resident’s income is the income used by the Medi-Cal program for the purpose of determining eligibility for covered services.SEC. 2. Section 14005.395 is added to the Welfare and Institutions Code, to read:14005.395. (a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), for the purposes of determining an individual’s eligibility for the Medi-Cal program pursuant to this chapter, the difference retained by the resident of a residential care facility for the elderly pursuant to subdivision (d) (c) of Section 1569.147 of the Health and Safety Code shall be excluded from their countable income, as defined in Section 14005.40.(b) Subdivision (a) does not apply to the portion of the difference retained by a resident of a residential care facility for the elderly pursuant to subdivision (d) (c) of Section 1569.147 of the Health and Safety Code that exceeds the personal and incidental needs allowance set for a recipient of SSI/SSP in nonmedical out-of-home care, as established by the department pursuant to Section 13921.(c) This section applies in addition to any other deductions or calculations to determine financial eligibility pursuant to this chapter.(d) This section shall be implemented only if, and to the extent that, any necessary federal approvals have been obtained and federal financial participation is not jeopardized.SEC. 3. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution for certain costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district because, in that regard, this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.However, if the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains other costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.